District of Columbia statutes.
29-604.08

Actions by partnership and partners.

(a)

A partnership may maintain an action against a partner for a breach of the partnership agreement, or for the violation of a duty to the partnership, causing harm to the partnership.

(b)

A partner may maintain an action against the partnership or another partner for legal or equitable relief, with or without an accounting as to partnership business, to enforce the:

(1)

Partner’s rights under the partnership agreement;

(2)

Partner’s rights under this chapter, including:

(A)

The partner’s rights under § 29-604.01, § 29-604.03, or § 29-604.04;

(B)

The partner’s right on dissociation to have the partner’s interest in the partnership purchased pursuant to § 29-607.01 or enforce any other right under subchapter VI or VII of this chapter; or

(C)

The partner’s right to compel a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business under § 29-608.01 or enforce any other right under subchapter VIII of this chapter; or

(3)

Rights and otherwise protect the interests of the partner, including rights and interests arising independently of the partnership relationship.

(c)

The accrual of, and any time limitation on, a right of action for a remedy under this section shall be governed by other law. A right to an accounting upon a dissolution and winding up shall not revive a claim barred by law.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(4)(C), 59 DCR 13171

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 41-154.5.
2001 Ed., § 33-104.05.
2001 Ed., § 29-604.05.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 redesignated former § 20-604.05 as § 29-604.08.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 405 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.